Louisiana, session 2026, SB181.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 4:707(E)(5) through (9) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
4:707(E)(10) and (H)(5) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§707. Authorization to license certain organizations; exemption; requirement for
state license
* * *
E. In addition to the provisions of R.S. 4:703, the following definitions shall
apply for the purposes of this Section:
* * *
(5) "Nonprofit healthcare organization" shall mean any organization
that provides healthcare services, together with its parent organization,
affiliates, subsidiaries and foundations, that is licensed or chartered in this state,
is affiliated with a hospital that meets the definition of "hospital" as provided
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 181 ENROLLED
by R.S. 40:2102(2), and is exempt from federal and state taxation pursuant to
the Internal Revenue Code and applicable provisions of Louisiana law.
(6) "Parent-teacher association" shall mean an organization which is
comprised of teachers and parents of children enrolled in a public or a private
nonprofit elementary or secondary school in this state and which has been designated
by the school board of the parish or city in which such school is located to collect
funds in the name of that school.
(6)(7) "Private nonprofit elementary or secondary school" includes every
nonprofit private elementary or secondary school within the state of Louisiana.
(7)(8) "Public elementary or secondary school" includes every public
elementary or secondary school within the state of Louisiana.
(8)(9) "Public institution of higher education" includes every in-state public
graduate and undergraduate institution, public junior and community college, public
technical institute, and each separate school or department of the institution, college,
or institute when the entire net proceeds are devoted to support the institution.
(9)(10) "Volunteer fire company" shall mean an organization which has been
engaged by the governing authority of a parish, municipality, or fire protection
district to provide fire protection services to the area of this state under its
jurisdiction and which is comprised predominantly of individuals who provide such
services voluntarily and without compensation.
* * *
H. * * *
* * *
(5)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, all nonprofit healthcare organizations as defined in Subsection E of
this Section that are part of a single health system may obtain and operate
under a single state charitable gaming license, provided that each participating
entity is otherwise eligible for a license pursuant to this Chapter. The parent
organization shall annually notify the office of charitable gaming of the names
of the organizations that will operate under the single license.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 181 ENROLLED
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 4:707.1(B), a nonprofit
healthcare organization shall be eligible for a limited raffle license.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.